Alaska, session 34, SB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 14.25.070(d) is amended to read: 06 (d) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the annual employer contribution rate 07 may not be less than the rate sufficient to allow payment of 08 (1) the employer normal cost; 09 (2) an amount calculated at the rate certified under 10 AS 37.10.220(a)(8) for liquidating past service liability of the plan; and 11 (3) the employer contributions required under AS 14.25.350 and 12 AS 39.30.370. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 39.35.255(d) is amended to read: 14 (d) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the annual employer contribution rate 01 may not be less than the rate sufficient to allow payment of 02 (1) the employer normal cost; 03 (2) an amount calculated at the rate certified under 04 AS 37.10.220(a)(8) for liquidating past service liability of the plan; and 05 (3) the employer contributions required under AS 39.30.370 and 06 AS 39.35.750. 07 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.